New York, session 2025-2026, S9686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "concussion 2 management and awareness improvement act of 2026". 3 § 2. Paragraph a of subdivision 42 of section 305 of the education 4 law, as added by chapter 496 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 a. The commissioner, in conjunction with the commissioner of health, 7 shall promulgate and review as necessary rules and regulations relating 8 to pupils who suffer mild traumatic brain injuries, also referred to as 9 a "concussion," while receiving instruction or engaging in any school 10 sponsored or school related activity. In developing such rules and 11 regulations, the commissioner shall consider comments from stakeholders 12 and other interested parties including but not limited to parents, 13 teachers, students, school administrators, school athletic trainers, 14 sport coaches, medical and health professionals, the public schools 15 athletic league (PSAL), the New York state public high school athletic 16 association (NYSPHSAA), and other athletic associations. Such regu- 17 lations shall include, but not be limited to: 18 (i) requiring a course of instruction relating to recognizing the 19 symptoms of mild traumatic brain injuries and monitoring and seeking 20 proper medical treatment for pupils who suffer mild traumatic brain 21 injuries. Such course of instruction shall be required to be completed 22 on a biennial basis by all school coaches, physical education teachers, 23 nurses [and], athletic trainers, and medical directors employed by or 24 under contract to a school or school district. The course of instruc- 25 tion required by this subparagraph shall include, but not be limited to, 26 the definition of a "concussion," signs and symptoms of mild traumatic 27 brain injuries, how such injuries may occur, practices regarding 28 prevention, and the guidelines for the return to school and to certain EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07744-04-6 S. 9686 2 1 school activities after a pupil has suffered a mild traumatic brain 2 injury regardless of whether such injury occurred outside of school. 3 Such training may be completed by means of courses of instruction, 4 including but not limited to, courses provided online and by teleconfer- 5 ence approved by the department; 6 (ii) providing that the department and the department of health shall 7 post on their internet websites information relating to mild traumatic 8 brain injuries, which shall include but not be limited to, the defi- 9 nition of a "concussion," signs and symptoms of mild traumatic brain 10 injuries, how such injuries may occur, and the guidelines for the return 11 to school and to certain school activities after a pupil has suffered a 12 mild traumatic brain injury regardless of whether such injury occurred 13 outside of school. Schools shall be required to include such information 14 in any permission form or parent or person in parental relation consent 15 form or similar document that may be required for a pupil's partic- 16 ipation in interscholastic sports and shall also include such informa- 17 tion, or reference how to obtain such information from the department 18 and the department of health internet websites, on the school's internet 19 website, if one exists; 20 (iii) requiring the immediate removal from athletic activities of any 21 pupil believed to have sustained or who has sustained a mild traumatic 22 brain injury. In the event that there is any doubt as to whether a pupil 23 has sustained a concussion, it shall be presumed that [he or she] such 24 pupil has been so injured until proven otherwise. No such pupil shall 25 resume athletic activity until [he or she] such pupil shall have been 26 symptom free for not less than twenty-four hours, has returned to a full 27 class schedule without academic accommodations made due to the mild 28 traumatic brain injury, and has been evaluated by and received written 29 and signed authorization from a licensed physician, physician assistant 30 or nurse practitioner. Such authorization shall be kept on file in the 31 pupil's permanent health record. Furthermore, such rules and regulations 32 shall provide guidelines for limitations and restrictions on school and 33 athletic attendance and activities for pupils who have sustained mild 34 traumatic brain injuries, consistent with the directives of the pupil's 35 treating physician. 36 (iv) authorizing each school or school district, in its discretion, to 37 establish a concussion management team which may be composed of the 38 athletic director (if any), a school nurse, the school principal, a 39 school guidance counselor, a school teacher, the school [physician] or 40 district medical director, a coach of an interscholastic team, an 41 athletic trainer or such other appropriate personnel as designated by 42 the school or school district. The concussion management team shall 43 oversee the implementation of the rules and regulations promulgated 44 pursuant to this subdivision as it pertains to their associated school 45 including the requirement that all school coaches, physical education 46 teachers, nurses and athletic trainers that work with and provide 47 instruction to pupils engaged in school sponsored athletic activities 48 complete training relating to mild traumatic brain injuries. Further- 49 more, every concussion management team may establish and implement a 50 program which provides information on mild traumatic brain injuries to 51 parents and persons in parental relation throughout each school year. 52 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 53 the date on which it shall have become a law.